Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-446
Permit fees; State Park Cash Revolving Fund; disbursement.

The permit fees charged under sections 37-438 and 37-439 shall be credited to the State Park Cash Revolving Fund and shall be disbursed for the administration, improvement, operation, and maintenance of those areas, or portion of areas, of the state park system which are designated as permit areas.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1114;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 156;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 41.